New York, session 2025-2026, S8855.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 3 of section 30.10 of the 2 criminal procedure law, as amended by chapter 11 of the laws of 2019, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (f) For purposes of a prosecution involving a sexual offense as 5 defined in article one hundred thirty of the penal law, other than a 6 sexual offense delineated in paragraph (a) of subdivision two of this 7 section, committed against a child less than eighteen years of age, 8 incest in the first, second or third degree as defined in sections 9 255.27, 255.26 and 255.25 of the penal law committed against a child 10 less than eighteen years of age, [or] use of a child in a sexual 11 performance as defined in section 263.05 of the penal law, or endanger- 12 ing the welfare of a child as defined in subdivision one of section 13 260.10 of the penal law, the period of limitation shall not begin to run 14 until the child has reached the age of twenty-three or the offense is 15 reported to a law enforcement agency or statewide central register of 16 child abuse and maltreatment, whichever occurs earlier. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10292-02-5